Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.220

Copies of proceedings, records, and acts of the commission admissible in court as prima facie evidence of the truth of the statements contained therein.

Copies of the proceedings, records, and acts of the commission, when certified by the chair, are admissible in any court as prima facie evidence of the truth of the statements contained therein.

[ 2009 c 33 s 23.]